Utah statutes.
38-11-105.   Procedures established by rule.
In compliance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, the
division shall establish procedures by rule by which claims for compensation
from the fund and requests for certificates of compliance shall be adjudicated
and by which assessments shall be collected.
